src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-II-mîthwasin_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

   Lemma - mîthwâsin : 

      # Core 

      # Prs+Ind
      mîthwâsin+V+II+Ind+3Sg: mîthwâsin

      # Prs+Cnj
      PV/î+mîthwâsin+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: î-mîthwâsik
      

      # Prs # Ind
      mîthwâsin+V+II+Ind+3Sg: mîthwâsin
      mîthwâsin+V+II+Ind+4Sg: mîthwâsinithiw
      mîthwâsin+V+II+Ind+3Pl: mîthwâsinwa
      mîthwâsin+V+II+Ind+4Pl: mîthwâsinithiwa
      

      # Prs # Cnj
      PV/î+mîthwâsin+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: î-mîthwâsik
      PV/î+mîthwâsin+V+II+Cnj+4Sg: î-mîthwâsinithik
      PV/î+mîthwâsin+V+II+Cnj+3Pl: î-mîthwâsiki
      PV/î+mîthwâsin+V+II+Cnj+3Pl+Var/East: [î-mîthwâsikwâ, î-mîthwâsikiht]
      PV/î+mîthwâsin+V+II+Cnj+4Pl: î-mîthwâsinithiki
      PV/î+mîthwâsin+V+II+Cnj+4Pl+Var/East: î-mîthwâsinithikwâ
      

      # Prt # Ind
      PV/ki+mîthwâsin+V+II+Ind+3Sg: kî-mîthwâsin
      PV/ki+mîthwâsin+V+II+Ind+4Sg: kî-mîthwâsinithiw
      PV/ki+mîthwâsin+V+II+Ind+3Pl: kî-mîthwâsinwa
      PV/ki+mîthwâsin+V+II+Ind+4Pl: kî-mîthwâsinithiwa
      

      # Prt # Cnj
      PV/î+PV/ki+mîthwâsin+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: î-kî-mîthwâsik
      PV/î+PV/ki+mîthwâsin+V+II+Cnj+4Sg: î-kî-mîthwâsinithik
      PV/î+PV/ki+mîthwâsin+V+II+Cnj+3Pl: î-kî-mîthwâsiki
      PV/î+PV/ki+mîthwâsin+V+II+Cnj+3Pl+Var/East: [î-kî-mîthwâsikwâ, î-kî-mîthwâsikiht]
      PV/î+PV/ki+mîthwâsin+V+II+Cnj+4Pl: î-kî-mîthwâsinithiki
      PV/î+PV/ki+mîthwâsin+V+II+Cnj+4Pl+Var/East: î-kî-mîthwâsinithikwâ
      

      # Fut+Int # Ind
      PV/wi+mîthwâsin+V+II+Ind+3Sg: wî-mîthwâsin
      PV/wi+mîthwâsin+V+II+Ind+4Sg: wî-mîthwâsinithiw
      PV/wi+mîthwâsin+V+II+Ind+3Pl: wî-mîthwâsinwa
      PV/wi+mîthwâsin+V+II+Ind+4Pl: wî-mîthwâsinithiwa
      

      # Fut+Int # Cnj
      PV/î+PV/wi+mîthwâsin+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: î-wî-mîthwâsik
      PV/î+PV/wi+mîthwâsin+V+II+Cnj+4Sg: î-wî-mîthwâsinithik
      PV/î+PV/wi+mîthwâsin+V+II+Cnj+3Pl: î-wî-mîthwâsiki
      PV/î+PV/wi+mîthwâsin+V+II+Cnj+3Pl+Var/East: [î-wî-mîthwâsikwâ, î-wî-mîthwâsikiht]
      PV/î+PV/wi+mîthwâsin+V+II+Cnj+4Pl: î-wî-mîthwâsinithiki
      PV/î+PV/wi+mîthwâsin+V+II+Cnj+4Pl+Var/East: î-wî-mîthwâsinithikwâ

      

      # Fut+Def # Ind
      PV/ka+mîthwâsin+V+II+Ind+3Sg: ka-mîthwâsin
      PV/ka+mîthwâsin+V+II+Ind+4Sg: ka-mîthwâsinithiw
      PV/ka+mîthwâsin+V+II+Ind+3Pl: ka-mîthwâsinwa
      PV/ka+mîthwâsin+V+II+Ind+4Pl: ka-mîthwâsinithiwa
      

      # Inf # PV/ka
      PV/ka+mîthwâsin+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: ka-mîthwâsik
      PV/ka+mîthwâsin+V+II+Cnj+4Sg: ka-mîthwâsinithik
      PV/ka+mîthwâsin+V+II+Cnj+3Pl: ka-mîthwâsiki
      PV/ka+mîthwâsin+V+II+Cnj+3Pl+Var/East: [ka-mîthwâsikwâ, ka-mîthwâsikiht]
      PV/ka+mîthwâsin+V+II+Cnj+4Pl: ka-mîthwâsinithiki
      PV/ka+mîthwâsin+V+II+Cnj+4Pl+Var/East: ka-mîthwâsinithikwâ
      

      # Inf # PV/ta
      PV/ta+mîthwâsin+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: ta-mîthwâsik
      PV/ta+mîthwâsin+V+II+Cnj+4Sg: ta-mîthwâsinithik
      PV/ta+mîthwâsin+V+II+Cnj+3Pl: ta-mîthwâsiki
      PV/ta+mîthwâsin+V+II+Cnj+3Pl+Var/East: [ta-mîthwâsikwâ, ta-mîthwâsikiht]
      PV/ta+mîthwâsin+V+II+Cnj+4Pl: ta-mîthwâsinithiki
      PV/ta+mîthwâsin+V+II+Cnj+4Pl+Var/East: ta-mîthwâsinithikwâ
      

      # Fut # Cond
      mîthwâsin+V+II+Fut+Cond+3Sg: mîthwâsiki
      mîthwâsin+V+II+Fut+Cond+4Sg: mîthwâsinithiki
      mîthwâsin+V+II+Fut+Cond+3Pl: mîthwâsikwâwi
      mîthwâsin+V+II+Fut+Cond+4Pl: mîthwâsinithikwâwi
